Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,142
Department of Correctional Services;
duties; legislative intent.

The Department of Correctional
Services shall develop and implement an incarceration work camp for placement of felony offenders as a condition of a
sentence of intensive supervision probation, as a transitional phase
prior to release on parole,
or as assigned by the Director of Correctional Services pursuant to subsection
(2) of section 83-176. As part of the incarceration work camp,
an intensive residential drug treatment program may be developed and implemented
for felony offenders.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the incarceration work camp
serve to reduce prison overcrowding and to make prison bed space available
for violent offenders. It is the further intent of the Legislature that the
incarceration work camp serve the interests of society by addressing the criminogenic
needs of certain designated offenders and by deterring such offenders from
engaging in further criminal activity. To accomplish these goals, the incarceration
work camp shall provide regimented, structured, disciplined programming, including
all of the following: Work programs; vocational training; behavior management
and modification; money management; substance abuse awareness, counseling,
and treatment; and education, programming needs, and aftercare planning, which
will increase the offender's abilities to lead a law-abiding, productive,
and fulfilling life as a contributing member of a free society.

Laws 1997, LB 882, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 538, § 27;

Laws 2007, LB83, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB274, § 1.